Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

General Provisions

66-5-101. Grants or devises passing full estate.

Every grant or devise of real estate, or any interest therein, shall pass all the estate or interest of the grantor or devisor, unless the intent to pass a less estate or interest shall appear by express terms, or be necessarily implied in the terms of the instrument.

Code 1858, § 2006 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 33); Shan., § 3672; Code 1932, § 7597; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-501.

Cross-References. Deeds of officers as prima facie evidence of facts recited, §24-5-101.

Estates in property, title 66, ch. 1.

Estate with unlimited power of disposition, §66-1-106.

Execution by minor veterans, §58-3-103.

Operation of devise, §§32-3-101,32-3-102.

Transfer to class of persons, effect of death of one person before time of enjoyment, §32-3-104.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 98.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 34; 9 Tenn. Juris., Deeds, §§ 22, 25; 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 45; 21 Tenn. Juris., Remainders, Reversions and Executory Interests, §§ 15, 35; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 132.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161.

66-5-102. Mineral estates in coal.

In any instrument heretofore or hereafter executed purporting to sever the surface and mineral estates which does not describe the manner or method of mineral extraction in express and specific terms, it shall be presumed that the intention of the parties to the instrument was that the minerals be extracted only in the principal manner and method of mineral extraction prevailing in this state at the time the instrument was executed.

This section is not intended to exclude evidence that would otherwise be admissible to show the intentions of the parties.

This section shall only apply to mineral estates in coal.

Acts 1977, ch. 164, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-511.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 14.

Law Reviews.

Essay: Lawyering, Power, and Reform: The Legal Campaign to Abolish the Broad Form Mineral Deed (Dean Hill Rivkin), 66 Tenn. L. Rev. 467 (1999).

Legislative Clarification of the Correlative Rights of Surface and Mineral Owners (J. Stephen Dycus), 33 Vand. L. Rev. 871 (1980).

66-5-103. Forms of conveyances.

The following or other equivalent forms, varied to suit the precise state of facts, are sufficient for the purposes contemplated, without further circumlocution:

For a deed in fee with general warranty: “I hereby convey to A. B. the following tract of land (describing it), and I warrant the title against all persons whomsoever;”

Covenants of seisin, possession, and special warranty: “I covenant that I am seized and possessed of this land, and have a right to convey it, and I warrant the title against all persons claiming under me;”

For a quitclaim deed: “I hereby quitclaim to A. B. all my interest in the following land” (describing it);

For a mortgage: “I hereby convey to A. B. the following land (describing it), to be void upon condition that I pay,” etc; and

For a deed of trust: “For the purpose of securing to A. B. a note of this date, due at twelve (12) months, with interest from date (or as the case may be), I hereby convey to C. D., in trust, the following property (describing it). And if the note is not paid at maturity, I hereby authorize C. D. to sell the property herein conveyed (stating the manner, place of sale, notice, etc.), to execute a deed to the purchaser, to pay off the amount herein secured, with interest and costs, and to hold the remainder subject to my order.”

Code 1858, § 2013; Shan., § 3680; Code 1932, § 7607; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-502.

Cross-References. Conveyance by partner or partnership, §61-1-109.

Conveyances of property to state, §§12-2-104 —12-2-109.

Deed on execution sale, §§26-5-111 —26-5-113.

Judicial conveyances, §§16-1-107 —16-1-110.

Partnership property, §§61-1-203,61-1-204.

Privilege tax on conveyances, §67-4-409.

Use of Tennessee coordinate system in conveyances, §66-6-106.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 76.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-201, 8-204.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

Tennessee Homeowners' Post Foreclosure Auction Right to Cure Under 11 U.S.C. §§ 1322(b) and (c), 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 453 (1997).

66-5-104. Execution by agent or attorney.

Instruments in relation to real or personal property, executed by an agent or attorney, may be signed by such agent or attorney for the principal, or by writing the name of the principal by that person as agent or attorney; or by simply writing the agent's or attorney's own name or the principal's name, if the instrument on its face shows the character in which it is intended to be executed.

Code 1858, § 2012 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 153, § 1); Shan., § 3679; Code 1932, § 7606; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-503.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, §§ 11, 26; 9 Tenn. Juris., Deeds, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Agency — 1957 Tennessee Survey (F. Hodge O'Neal), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 973 (1957).

66-5-105. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-5-105 (Acts 1977, ch. 224, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 64-512), concerning the effect of mental and physical disability on powers of attorney, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 299, § 11, effective July 1, 1983, which also provided that any powers granted while this section was in effect shall remain in full force and in effect until otherwise terminated. For new law see title 34, ch. 6.

66-5-106. Authentication and registration required — Formal ceremonies unnecessary.

No deed of conveyance for lands, in whatever manner or form drawn, shall be good and available in law, as to strangers, unless it is acknowledged by the vendor, or proved by two (2) witnesses upon oath, in the manner prescribed in chapters 22 and 23 of this title, and registered by the register of the county where the land lies. All deeds so executed shall be valid and pass estates in land, or right to other estates, without livery of seisin, attornment, or other ceremony in the law whatever.

Code 1858, § 2005 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 38, § 5); Shan., § 3671; Code 1932, § 7596; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-504.

Cross-References. Effect of authentication and registration, title 66, ch. 26.

Extract copies from records as evidence, §24-6-106.

Index of public records, title 10, ch. 7, part 2.

Notary's fees, §8-21-1201.

Place of registration, §66-24-103.

Registration fees, §8-21-1001.

Statute of frauds, title 29, ch. 2.

Transfer of lots in unrecorded subdivisions restricted, §13-3-410.

Writings eligible for registration, §66-24-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 8; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, §§ 6, 15; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Recording Acts — Heir's Interest in Land After an Unrecorded Deed Executed by the Ancestor, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 282 (1930).

Attorney General Opinions. A deed transferring ownership of land from an applicant for TennCare long-term care benefits to another party does not constitute a valid transfer of property on the date of execution of the deed absent registration of the instrument in the county register's office, and such a deed does not preclude the TennCare Bureau from pursuing estate recovery against the property. OAG 04-161, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 173 (11/10/04).

66-5-107. Correction of errors.

Whenever an error or mistake is made in any deed of conveyance, or in the registration thereof, either in courses, distances, or names, the person liable to injury by such error or mistake may prefer a petition to the circuit court of the county in which the land is situated, setting forth the nature of the mistake or error, and all and singular the matters relative thereto.

Before the petition shall be heard and determined, the petitioner shall advertise in a newspaper published in the judicial district in which the land is situated; and if no newspaper is published in the district, then in a newspaper in the adjoining district, setting forth the substance of the petition, and the term at which petitioner will make application for a hearing, three (3) weeks in succession, at least thirty (30) days before the petition shall be heard.

The court may also direct written notice to be served upon such persons as may be interested in or affected by the relief sought, unless such notice shall appear to the court to have been previously given.

When any person chooses to oppose the granting of the petition, that party may personally enter as a defendant, and, each party having given security for cost, the cause shall stand for hearing as other argument cases.

The court shall examine such testimony as the petitioner may produce; and whenever it shall appear evident, from such testimony, that there was an error or mistake committed in drawing the deed of conveyance, the court shall order the same to be rectified, so as to comport with the intention of the parties; and shall further order the register of the county, in which the land is situated, to register the conveyance agreeably to the correction.

Either party may appeal from the judgment of the court, or prosecute a writ of error thereto.

Code 1858, §§ 2014-2019 (deriv. Acts 1813, ch. 83, §§ 1-3); Shan., §§ 3681-3685; Code 1932, §§ 7608-7613; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-505 — 64-510.

Cross-References. Correction of errors in acknowledgment or probate, §§66-26-113 —66-26-115.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Lands, § 10; 22 Tenn. Juris., Rescission, Cancellation and Reformation, § 47.

Law Reviews.

Daigle v. Shell Oil Company and the Bumpy Road to the Recoverability of Medical Monitoring Expenses Under CERCLA, 47 Vand. L. Rev. 235 (1994).

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. LeClercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241 (1978).

66-5-108. Preservation, or extinguishment and reversion of mineral interests.

The general assembly finds that many owners of agricultural property who have separated titles have difficulty acquiring loans and in other ways have been hindered in fully developing the surface of land.

The general assembly further finds that there are mineral estates, separated from the surface, that have not been properly registered in the counties in which they are located, and are, therefore, not on the tax rolls, causing a significant loss of revenue to many Tennessee counties.

Further, the general assembly finds that many surface owners cannot discover from records at their courthouses whether they own the underlying mineral estate, or if they do not, who does, and that this situation causes undue hardship and title uncertainty for surface owners.

The general assembly further finds that where there are abandoned mineral estates, those on which no development has taken place, no taxes paid and no claim filed pursuant to this section, the rational development of minerals in Tennessee is hindered.

Thus, to promote commerce and agriculture and proper development of surface and mineral estates and to remedy uncertainties in title, the general assembly adopts this section.

For the purposes of this section and §§ 67-5-804(b), 67-5-809 and 67-5-2502(e):

“Mineral interest” means the interest which is created by an instrument, transferring either by grant, assignment, or reservation, or otherwise, an interest, of any kind, in coal, oil and gas, and other minerals;

“Statement of claim” means a document or instrument to be filed by the owner of a mineral interest in real property to make claim to that mineral interest; and

“Use of mineral interest” means that a mineral interest shall be deemed to be used when there are any minerals being produced thereunder or when operations are being conducted thereon for injection, withdrawal, storage or disposal of water, gas or other fluid substances, or when rentals or royalties are being paid to the owner thereof for the purposes of delaying or enjoying the use or exercise of such rights, or when any such use is being carried out on any tract with which such mineral interest may be unitized or pooled for production purposes, or when taxes are paid on such mineral interest by the owner of the land.

Any interest in coal, oil and gas, and other minerals shall, if unused for a period of twenty (20) years, be extinguished, unless a statement of claim is filed in accordance with subsection (d), and the ownership of the mineral interest shall revert to the owner of the surface.

The statement of claim provided in subsection (c) shall be filed by the owner of the mineral interest prior to the end of the twenty-year period set forth in subsection (c) or within three (3) years after July 1, 1987, whichever is later.

The statement of claim shall contain the name and address of the owner or owners of such mineral interest. The claim shall cite tax maps and parcel numbers for the owner or owners of surface above the mineral estate, and a reference to the instrument under which the interest is claimed.

The statement of claim shall be filed with the office of the register of deeds in the county in which such land is located.

Upon filing of the statement of claim within the time provided, it shall be prima facie evidence in any legal proceedings that such mineral interest was being used on the date the statement of claim was filed.

Any person who will succeed to the ownership of any mineral interest upon the lapse thereof may commence such lapse by filing, with the clerk and master of the county in which the mineral interest is located, a complaint of claim of abandoned mineral interest which may be in the following or a similar form:

COMPLAINT FOR CLAIM OF ABANDONED MINERAL INTEREST I, , after being duly sworn according to law, would state to the Court as follows: 1. My full name is and I reside at . (address) 2. I am the current owner of record of a surface estate located at of record in Book , Page , Register's Office of County, Tennessee. 3. After inquiring with the county property assessor, I am not aware of any tax being paid for the mineral estate which underlies my surface estate. The mineral estate is of record (if known) in Book , Page , Register's Office of County, Tennessee. The name of the mineral interest owner (if known) is and the address (if known) is . 4. Upon reasonable inquiry, I am not aware of any use being made of the mineral estate underlying my surface estate as defined in Tennessee Code Annotated, §66-5-108 . 5. I believe the mineral interest is abandoned. 6. Upon the publishing of notice as required by Tennessee Code Annotated, §66-5-108 and the failure of the mineral interest owner to file a statement of claim, plaintiff demands that the mineral interest be declared to be abandoned, that the interest lapse and be reunited with the above-mentioned surface estate. This day of , 20 . (Signature of surface owner) State of Tennessee County of Personally appeared before me, (name of clerk or deputy) of the county, , the within named plaintiff, (plaintiff's name) having been duly sworn who acknowledged that plaintiff executed the within instrument for the purposes therein contained. Witness my hand, this day of , 20 . My commission expires: .

Click to view form.

The complaint shall be verified and filed by the clerk and master upon payment of the fee provided in subdivision (e)(8).

Upon the filing of a complaint of claim of abandoned mineral interest the clerk and master shall give notice that the mineral interest identified in the complaint shall lapse in sixty (60) days by publishing the same once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which such mineral interest is located, and shall send by certified mail within ten (10) days after such publication a copy of such notice to the owner of such mineral interest identified by the plaintiff in the complaint of claim of abandoned mineral interest.

If, within sixty (60) days after publication provided in subdivision (e)(3), the mineral interest owner does not file with the clerk and master an answer alleging a claim to the mineral interest, the clerk and master shall so certify to the chancellor who shall enter the following order declaring the mineral interest has lapsed and vesting title to the mineral interest in the owner of the surface estate:

Order The cause came to be heard this day of , 20 , before the Honorable , Chancellor of the Chancery Court for County, upon the Complaint for Claim of Abandoned Mineral Interest pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §66-5-108 , and certification by the Clerk and Master that no answer has been filed after providing the notice required by that statute. The Court, therefore, finds that there has been no use of the mineral interest located at of record, if known, in Book , Page , Register's Office of County, Tennessee, as defined in Tennessee Code Annotated, §66-5-108 ; and the mineral interest has been abandoned. IT IS THEREFORE ORDERED, ADJUDGED AND DECREED that the mineral interest located at (Address) , of record, if known, in Book , Page , Register's Office of County, Tennessee, is abandoned and that mineral estate shall be reunited to the surface interest titled to (name of surface owner) of record in Book , Page , Register's Office of County, Tennessee. Chancellor

Click to view form.

All notices provided for in this section shall state the name of the owner of the mineral interest, if known, as shown of record, a description of the land and the name of the person filing the complaint of claim of abandoned mineral interest.

In any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand six hundred (32,600) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, upon the filing of the statement of claim provided in subsection (d) or the order provided in subdivision (e)(4) in the register of deeds office for the county where such interest is located, the register shall record the same in a book to be kept for that purpose, which shall be known as the “Dormant Mineral Interest Record,” and shall indicate by marginal notation on the instrument creating the original mineral interest and the instrument creating the interest of the current surface owner, the filing of the statement of claim or order.

In order for the judicially determined lapse to be effective as to the subsequent interest holders, a certified copy of the final order evidencing the same must be recorded in the register of deeds office in the county where the property is located.

The clerk and master shall charge a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) for the filing of the complaint of claim of abandoned mineral interest and the order provided for in this section and shall collect the fees necessary for the publication required in this section.

No complaint for claim of abandoned mineral interest shall be accepted for filing prior to July 1, 1990.

Upon the filing of the statement of claim as provided in subsection (c), the register shall record the same in a book to be kept for that purpose which shall be known as the “Dormant Mineral Interest Record” and shall enter in the index where the instrument creating the original mineral interest is indexed a notation referencing the statement of claim. Upon the filing of the order as provided in subdivision (e)(4), the register shall record the order in the Dormant Mineral Interest Record and shall enter the filing of the order in the indexes referencing the instrument creating the original mineral interest and the instrument creating the interest of the current surface owner.

In any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand six hundred (32,600) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, upon the filing of the statement of claim as provided in subsection (c) or the proof of service of notice as provided in subsection (e) in the register of deeds office for the county where such interest is located, the register shall record the same in a book to be kept for that purpose, which shall be known as the “Dormant Mineral Interest Record,” and shall indicate by marginal notation on the instrument creating the original mineral interest the filing of the statement of claim or affidavit of publication and service of notice.

The provisions of Acts 1987, chapter 282, may not be waived at any time prior to the expiration of the twenty-year period provided in subsection (c).

This section applies in all ways to property owned by the state.

This section may not be waived at any time prior to the expiration of the twenty-year period provided in subsection (c).

No action shall be brought by any person to contest the lapse of a mineral interest pursuant to this section after three (3) years from the date such interest lapsed.

Any person who prevails in an action to quiet title to challenge a statement of claim or a complaint for claim of abandoned mineral interests filed pursuant to this section may be awarded reasonable attorney's fees and costs if the court finds that the statement of claim or the complaint was not filed in good faith. A court may find that a statement of claim or the complaint was not filed in good faith if such was filed without reasonable inquiry, with no factual basis, and for purposes of harassment.

If the court finds no record of taxes paid or statement of claim filed for the lapsed mineral interests which references the mineral estate by tax map and parcel number, then a complaint for claim of abandoned mineral interest shall be deemed to have been filed in good faith.

The only parties of interest pursuant to this section shall be an owner of the mineral interest and a person who shall succeed to the ownership of the mineral interest upon its lapse. Any third person claiming title or interest in any matter pursuant to this section shall prove by verified complaint, affidavit or other evidence that the third person's rights are or will be violated and that such third person will suffer injury, loss or damage if not allowed to become a party thereto.

Acts 1987, ch. 282, §§ 1, 2, 7, 9, 12; 1988, ch. 636, §§ 15, 16; 1988, ch. 702, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 902, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 19 provided that the amendment by that act shall serve to ratify transactions occurring on or after July 1, 1988.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Classification and assessment, mineral interests, back assessments, location, §67-5-809.

Classification and assessment, records, identification and registration of mineral interests, §67-5-804.

Limitation of actions, lapse of mineral interests, §28-2-110.

Notice of sale of land, mineral interests, §67-5-2502.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-227, 8-431, 8-1112.

Law Reviews.

CERCLA Liability of Mineral Rights Owners — Another Pocket to Pick?, 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 77 (1989).

When Policies Collide: The Conflict Between the Bankruptcy Code and CERCLA, 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 739 (1994).

66-5-109. Effective date of conveyance.

The effective date of any conveyance of real property in this state is presumed to be the date of the instrument of conveyance, and shall not be affected by a notary acknowledgment in such conveyance which may be dated prior or subsequent to the date of the conveyance.

If an instrument conveying real property is not dated, but contains a notary acknowledgment which is dated, the effective date of the instrument shall be the date of the notary acknowledgment.

If the instrument is not dated, but contains more than one (1) notary acknowledgment, containing more than one (1) date, the latest date of a notary acknowledgment in the instrument shall be the effective date of the instrument.

Acts 1989, ch. 483, §§ 1, 2.

66-5-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-5-110 (Acts 1991, ch. 125, § 1), concerning the transfer of realty and the non-disclosure of real estate's prior occupation by a person with AIDS or of realty's criminal history, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 12, effective July 1, 1994.

66-5-111. Identification of specific mineral interests to be conveyed.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, where an owner of surface and mineral rights to real property enters into a contract for the conveyance of mineral rights in such property resulting in a severance of such interests, the parties to such conveyance shall identify the specific mineral interests to be conveyed to the purchaser of the mineral rights. The purchaser of the mineral interests shall identify such interests purchased by providing a deed reference number in accordance with §67-5-804(c) for the mineral interest with the property assessor in the county in which the interests are located as prescribed in this section. For the purposes of this section, “specific mineral interests” means only those minerals listed in the deed as contemplated by the parties. All rights to minerals not described in the deed shall remain with the surface owner. This section shall apply to all contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2011, and shall not impair the obligation of any existing contract or be construed to direct courts in determining the intent of the parties who entered into a contract prior to such date.

Acts 2011, ch. 341, § 4.